Hawaii statutes.
§53-53 Powers with respect to urban
renewal. A redevelopment agency shall have all the powers necessary or
convenient to undertake and carry out all urban renewal plans and urban renewal
projects, including the authority to acquire and dispose of property, to issue
bonds and other obligations, to borrow and accept grants from the federal
government or any other source, and to exercise the other powers which this
chapter confers on an agency with respect to redevelopment projects. For the
purposes of this part in connection with the planning and undertaking of any
urban renewal plan or urban renewal project, the agency, the county, and all
public and private officers, agencies, and bodies shall have all the rights,
powers, privileges, and immunities which they have with respect to a
redevelopment plan or redevelopment project, in the same manner as though all
of the provisions of part I of this chapter applicable to a redevelopment plan
or redevelopment project were therein expressly made applicable to an urban
renewal plan or urban renewal project; and for such purposes as used in part I
and in this part elsewhere than in this section, except where the context
clearly indicates such meaning to be inappropriate or as otherwise expressly
provided in this section:

(1) The word "redevelopment" (elsewhere
than in section 53-1) means "urban renewal";

(2) The word "slum" and the word
"blighted" (elsewhere than in section 53-1) mean "blighted,
deteriorated, or deteriorating";

provided (A) that nothing in this part shall be
deemed to change the meaning of the terms "local redevelopment
agency" or "agency," or the corporate name of any local
redevelopment agency; and (B) that the finding by the council that the project
area is a blighted area prescribed by section 53-6 shall not be required.

In addition to the surveys and plans which an
agency otherwise may make, an agency may make (1) plans for carrying out a
program of voluntary repair and rehabilitation of buildings and improvements,
and (2) plans for the enforcement of laws, codes, and regulations relating to
the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements, and to
the compulsory repair, rehabilitation, demolition, or removal of buildings and
improvements. The agency may develop, test, and report methods and techniques,
and carry out demonstrations and other activities, for the prevention and the
elimination of slums and other urban blight. [L 1955, c 271, pt of §1; RL 1955,
§143-53; HRS §53-53; am L 1999, c 18, §2]

Cross References

For definition of "agency, the county" in first
paragraph, see §53-83(17).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next